Missouri, session 2026, HB1943.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 486.735, 570.095, and 578.700, RSMo, are repealed and five new
sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections 59.306, 443.295, 486.735, 570.095,
and 578.700, to read as follows:
59.306. 1. This section shall be known and may be cited as "The Real Property
Fraud Prevention Act".
2. The recorder of deeds of each county of this state shall provide notice as
required under this section to each property owner or owner of record of a parcel of real
property, as determined by the most recent real property tax records, that a general
warranty deed or quitclaim deed that affects the ownership of such parcel of real
property has been submitted for recording.
3. The recorder of deeds shall:
(1) Delay the recording of a deed described under subsection 2 of this section for
at least five working days from the date of such deed's receipt to provide time for the
recorder of deeds to notify each property owner or owner of record of such parcel of
real property that such deed has been submitted for recording;
(2) Notify each property owner or owner of record of such parcel of real
property by telephone, text message, facsimile, or email, if such information is known;
and
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1943 2
(3) Send such notification by first-class mail to the address of record of each
property owner or owner of record of such parcel of real property, informing such
owner that a deed that affects such owner's ownership interest in the real property
described by such deed has been submitted for recording.
4. (1) If each property owner or owner of record of such parcel of real property
provides written confirmation that the deed presented for recording is legitimate, the
delay required under subdivision (1) of subsection 3 of this section shall no longer apply,
and the recorder of deeds may immediately proceed with the recording of the deed.
(2) If, prior to the expiration of the delay required under subdivision (1) of
subsection 3 of this section, the recorder of deeds is notified by each property owner or
owner of record of such parcel of real property that such deed is fraudulent, the
recorder of deeds shall delay the recording of the deed for at least an additional two
business days to provide time for each property owner or owner of record of such parcel
of real property to seek an order from a court of competent jurisdiction to prohibit the
recording of the apparently fraudulent deed.
5. The recorder of deeds shall not delay the recording of a general warranty deed
or quitclaim deed as required under this section if at least one of the following
conditions has been met:
(1) The general warranty deed or quitclaim deed presented for recording was
submitted by a real estate broker who holds a valid Missouri real estate broker license
under chapter 339; or
(2) The general warranty deed or quitclaim deed presented for recording was
reviewed by a title company that is duly licensed under chapter 381 and such title
company has issued title insurance to guaranty the validity of the deed for the
prospective owner or owners of such parcel of real property.
6. (1) As used in this subsection, "defective deed" means a deed that:
(a) Fails to provide adequate grantee or grantor information;
(b) Fails to provide a proper description of the parcel of real property being
transferred;
(c) Lacks the signature of a grantor;
(d) Does not have a proper notary acknowledgment and seal under sections
486.730 and 486.760; or
(e) Is notarized by a notary whose commission has expired prior to notarizing
the deed.
(2) The recorder of deeds of each county of this state is hereby authorized to
reject and return a general warranty deed or quitclaim deed that has been deemed by
the recorder of deeds to be a defective deed.

HB 1943 3
443.295. A person shall not obtain a loan with a quitclaim deed unless the person
is a party to the original warranty deed or obtained title to the real property through a
quiet title action.
486.735. 1. A vendor or manufacturer shall register with the secretary prior to selling
or manufacturing notary seals. The secretary shall maintain an internet site for the purpose of
allowing vendors and manufacturers to confirm the current standing of any notary in the state.
2. A vendor or manufacturer shall not provide a notary seal to a purchaser claiming to
be a notary, unless the purchaser presents a notary commission issued by the secretary, and
unless:
(1) In the case of a purchaser appearing in person, the vendor or manufacturer
identifies this individual as the person named in the commission, through either personal
knowledge or satisfactory evidence of identity; or
(2) In the case of a purchaser ordering a seal by mail or delivery service, the vendor or
manufacturer confirms the notary's standing as a commissioned notary through the internet
site.
3. For each commission, a vendor or manufacturer shall make or sell only one seal
and, if requested by the person presenting the commission, only one embossing seal.
4. After manufacturing or providing a notary seal, the vendor shall affix an image of
all seals on a form as prescribed by the secretary and, within seven business days, send the
completed form to the secretary, retaining a copy of the form and the commission for a period
of five years.
5. A notary obtaining a seal as a result of a name change shall present a copy of the
confirmation of notary's name or address change from the secretary in accordance with
sections 486.780 and 486.785.
6. A vendor or manufacturer who fails to comply with this section shall be subject to a
fine of [one] five thousand dollars for each violation. For multiple violations, a vendor's
permission to sell or manufacture notary seals may be withdrawn by the secretary. Such
violation shall not preclude the civil liability of the vendor to parties injured by the vendor's
failure to comply with this section.
570.095. 1. A person commits the offense of filing false documents if:
(1) With the intent to defraud, deceive, harass, alarm, or negatively impact
financially, or in such a manner reasonably calculated to deceive, defraud, harass, alarm, or
negatively impact financially, he or she files, causes to be filed or recorded, or attempts to file
or record, creates, uses as genuine, transfers or has transferred, presents, or prepares with
knowledge or belief that it will be filed, presented, recorded, or transferred to the secretary of
state or the secretary's designee, to the recorder of deeds of any county or city not within a
county or the recorder's designee, to any municipal, county, district, or state government

HB 1943 4
entity, division, agency, or office, or to any credit bureau or financial institution any of the
following types of documents:
(a) Common law lien;
(b) Uniform commercial code filing or record;
(c) Real property recording;
(d) Financing statement;
(e) Contract;
(f) Warranty, special, or quitclaim deed;
(g) Quiet title claim or action;
(h) Deed in lieu of foreclosure;
(i) Legal affidavit;
(j) Legal process;
(k) Legal summons;
(l) Bills and due bills;
(m) Criminal charging documents or materially false criminal charging documents;
(n) Any other document not stated in this subdivision that is related to real property;
or
(o) Any state, county, district, federal, municipal, credit bureau, or financial
institution form or document; and
(2) Such document listed under subdivision (1) of this subsection contains materially
false information; is fraudulent; is a forgery, as [defined] described under section 570.090;
lacks the consent of all parties listed in a document that requires mutual consent; or is invalid
under Missouri law.
2. Filing false documents under this section is a class [D] C felony for the first
offense except the following circumstances shall be a class [C] B felony:
(1) The defendant has been previously found guilty or pleaded guilty to a violation of
this section;
(2) The victim or named party in the matter:
(a) Is an official elected to municipal, county, district, federal, or statewide office;
(b) Is an official appointed to municipal, county, district, federal, or statewide office;
or
(c) Is an employee of an official elected or appointed to municipal, county, district,
federal, or statewide office;
(3) The victim or named party in the matter is a judge or magistrate of:
(a) Any court or division of the court in this or any other state or an employee thereof;
or
(b) Any court system of the United States or is an employee thereof;

HB 1943 5
(4) The victim or named party in the matter is a full-time, part-time, or reserve or
auxiliary peace officer, as defined under section 590.010, who is licensed in this state or any
other state;
(5) The victim or named party in the matter is a full-time, part-time, or volunteer
firefighter in this state or any other state;
(6) The victim or named party in the matter is an officer of federal job class 1811 who
is empowered to enforce United States laws;
(7) The victim or named party in the matter is a law enforcement officer of the United
States as defined under 5 U.S.C. Section 8401(17)(A) or (D);
(8) The victim or named party in the matter is an employee of any law enforcement or
legal prosecution agency in this state, any other state, or the United States;
(9) The victim or named party in the matter is an employee of a federal agency that
has agents or officers of job class 1811 who are empowered to enforce United States laws or
is an employee of a federal agency that has law enforcement officers as defined under 5
U.S.C. Section 8401(17)(A) or (D); or
(10) The victim or named party in the matter is an officer of the railroad police as
[defined] authorized under section 388.600.
3. For a penalty enhancement as described under subsection 2 of this section to apply,
the occupation of the victim or named party shall be material to the subject matter of the
document or documents filed or the relief sought by the document or documents filed, and the
occupation of the victim or named party shall be materially connected to the apparent reason
that the victim has been named, victimized, or involved. For purposes of subsection 2 of this
section and this subsection, a person who has retired or resigned from any agency, institution,
or occupation listed under subsection 2 of this section shall be considered the same as a
person who remains in employment and shall also include the following family members of a
person listed under subdivisions (2) to (9) of subsection 2 of this section:
(1) Such person's spouse;
(2) Such person or such person's spouse's ancestor or descendant by blood or
adoption; or
(3) Such person's stepchild while the marriage creating that relationship exists.
4. Any person who pleads guilty or is found guilty under subsections 1 to 3 of this
section shall be ordered by the court to make full restitution to any person or entity that has
sustained actual losses or costs as a result of the actions of the defendants. Such restitution
shall not be paid in lieu of jail or prison time but rather in addition to any jail or prison time
imposed by the court.

HB 1943 6
5. (1) Nothing in this section shall limit the power of the state to investigate, charge,
or punish any person for any conduct that constitutes a crime by any other statute of this state
or the United States.
(2) No receiving entity shall be required under this section to retain the filing or
record for prosecution under this section. A filing or record being rejected by the receiving
entity shall not be used as an affirmative defense.
6. (1) Any agency of the state, a county, or a city not within a county that is
responsible for or receives document filings or records, including county recorders of deeds
and the secretary of state's office, shall, by January 1, 2019, impose a system in which the
documents that have been submitted to the receiving agency, or those filings rejected by the
secretary of state under its legal authority, are logged or noted in a ledger, spreadsheet, or
similar recording method if the filing or recording officer or employee believes the filings or
records appear to be fraudulent or contain suspicious language. The receiving agency shall
make noted documents available for review by:
(a) The jurisdictional prosecuting or circuit attorney or such attorney's designee;
(b) The county sheriff or the sheriff's designee;
(c) The police chief of a county or city not within a county or such chief's designee; or
(d) A commissioned peace officer as defined under section 590.010.

100 Review of such documents is permissible for the agent or agencies under this subdivision
101 without the need of a grand jury subpoena or court order. No fees or monetary charges shall
102 be levied on the investigative agents or agencies for review of documents noted in the ledger
103 or spreadsheet. The ledger or spreadsheet and its contents shall be retained by the agency that
104 controls entries into such ledger or spreadsheet for a minimum of three years from the earliest
105 entry listed in the ledger or spreadsheet.
106 (2) The receiving entity shall, upon receipt of a filing or record that has been noted as
107 a suspicious filing or record, notify the chief law enforcement officer or such officer's
108 designee of the county and the prosecutor or the prosecutor's designee of the county of the
109 filing's or record's existence. Such notification shall be made within two business days of the
110 filing or record having been received. Notification may be accomplished via email or via
111 paper memorandum.
112 (3) No agency receiving the filing or record shall be required under this section to
113 notify the person conducting the filing or record that the filing or record is entered as a logged
114 or noted filing or record.
115 (4) Reviews to ensure compliance with the provisions of this section shall be the
116 responsibility of any commissioned peace officer. Findings of noncompliance shall be
117 reported to the jurisdictional prosecuting or circuit attorney or such attorney's designee by any

HB 1943 7
118 commissioned peace officer who has probable cause to believe that the noncompliance has
119 taken place purposely, knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence, as described under
120 section 562.016.
121 7. To petition for a judicial review of a filing or record that is believed to be
122 fraudulent, false, misleading, forged, or contains materially false information, a petitioner
123 may file a probable cause statement that delineates the basis for the belief that the filing or
124 record is materially false, contains materially false information, is a forgery, is fraudulent, or
125 is misleading. This probable cause statement shall be filed in the associate or circuit court of
126 the county in which the original filing or record was transferred, received, or recorded.
127 8. A filed petition under this section shall have an initial hearing date within twenty
128 business days of the date the petition is filed with the court. A court ruling of invalid shall be
129 evidence that the original filing or record was not accurate, true, or correct. A court ruling of
130 invalid shall be retained or recorded at the original receiving entity. The receiving entity shall
131 waive all filing or recording fees associated with the filing or recording of the court ruling
132 document in this subsection. Such ruling may be forwarded to credit bureaus or other
133 institutions at the request of the petitioner via motion to the applicable court at no additional
134 cost to the petitioner.
135 9. If a filing or record is deemed invalid, court costs and fees are the responsibility of
136 the party who originally initiated the filing or record. If the filing or record is deemed valid,
137 no court costs or fees, in addition to standard filing fees, shall be assessed.
138 10. (1) Any property owner may present to law enforcement with jurisdiction
139 over the property's location information that a filed or recorded document listed in
140 subsection 1 of this section is fraudulent and conveys the property to a party through a
141 transaction in which the property owner did not consent.
142 (2) Upon the presentation of such information and an affidavit attesting to its
143 accuracy, including an attestation that the property owner did not have knowledge of
144 nor was a party to the transaction in question, local law enforcement shall investigate
145 the property owner's complaint.
146 (3) When law enforcement believes there is reasonable evidence the transaction
147 in question was fraudulent, they shall refer the matter to the prosecuting attorney.
148 (4) Upon the receipt of law enforcement's referral, the prosecuting attorney shall
149 have forty-five days to investigate the information associated with the complaint to
150 determine if there is probable cause that the document was filed or recorded
151 fraudulently.
152 (5) If there is probable cause that the document was filed or recorded
153 fraudulently, the prosecutor shall petition for a judicial review under subsections 7, 8,
154 and 9 of this section.

HB 1943 8
155 (6) In the event a property owner is found to have knowingly presented a false
156 claim to law enforcement under this section, such person may be subject to prosecution
157 for perjury.
158 (7) Any county recorder of deeds may post information on the investigation
159 process outlined in this subsection in their office and online.
578.700. 1. For purposes of this section, all definitions from section 486.600 shall
apply.
2. In performing a notarial act, a notary shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable
upon conviction by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not more
than six months, or both, for knowingly:
(1) Failing to require the presence of a principal at the time of a notarial act;
(2) Failing to identify a principal through personal knowledge or satisfactory
evidence; or
(3) Executing a false notarial certificate under subsection 1 of section 486.660.
3. A notary who knowingly performs any other act prohibited by chapter 486 or fails
to perform any other act required by chapter 486 shall be guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable
upon conviction by a fine not exceeding five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not more
than six months, or both.
4. Any person who is not a notary and who knowingly acts as or otherwise
impersonates a notary shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction
by a fine not exceeding [five hundred] two thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more
than [six months] one year, or both.
5. Any person who knowingly obtains, conceals, defaces, or destroys the seal,
journal, or official records of a notary shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable
upon conviction by a fine not exceeding [five hundred] two thousand dollars.
6. Any person who knowingly solicits, coerces, or in any way influences a notary to
commit official misconduct shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable upon
conviction by a fine not exceeding [five hundred] two thousand dollars.
7. Any person who knowingly obtains, conceals, damages, or destroys the coding,
disk, certificate, card, token, program, software, or hardware that is intended exclusively to
enable an electronic notary public to produce a registered electronic signature, notary seal, or
single element combining the required features of an electronic signature and notary seal,
shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction by a fine not exceeding
[five hundred] two thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more than [six months] one
year, or both.
8. Any person who is not a notary and knowingly presents false information to
obtain or attempt to obtain a notary public's seal from a manufacturer under chapter

HB 1943 9
486 shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor, punishable upon conviction by a fine not
exceeding two thousand dollars or imprisonment for not more than one year, or both.
9. The penalties of this section shall not preclude other sanctions and remedies
provided by law.
✔